Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-160
Employees of Department of Aeronautics; transfer to Division of Aeronautics; how treated.

On and after July 1, 2017, positions of employment in the Department of Aeronautics related to the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to Laws 2017, LB339, are transferred to the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation. For purposes of the transition, employees of the Department of Aeronautics shall be considered employees of the Department of Transportation and shall retain their rights under the state personnel system or pertinent bargaining agreement, and their service shall be deemed continuous. This section does not grant employees any new rights or benefits not otherwise provided by law or bargaining agreement or preclude the division or the director from exercising any of the prerogatives of management set forth in section 81-1311 or as otherwise provided by law. This section is not an amendment to or substitute for the provisions of any existing bargaining agreements.

Laws 2017, LB339, § 50.